Illinois, session 104th, HB877.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 405/1)  (from Ch. 15, par. 201)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "State Comptroller Act".9(Source: P.A. 77-2807.)